Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.05.020

Conservation district exception. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Elections of conservation district supervisors held pursuant to chapter 89.08 RCW shall not be considered general or special elections for purposes of the campaign disclosure and personal financial affairs reporting requirements of this title. Elected conservation district supervisors are not considered elected officials for purposes of the annual personal financial affairs reporting requirement of this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 402; 2002 c 43 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.17A.010, 42.17.035.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 43: See notes following RCW 29A.04.330.